Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.150

Proceedings to annul.

In such cases, the information may be filed by the prosecuting attorney upon his or her relation, or by any private person upon his or her relation showing his or her interest in the subject matter; and the subsequent proceedings, judgment of the court and awarding of costs, shall conform to the above provisions, and such letters patent, deed, or certificate shall be annulled or sustained, according to the right of the case.

[ 2011 c 336 s 245; Code 1881 s 716; 1877 p 145 s 720; 1854 p 218 s 483; RRS s 1048.]